Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3346
Title IV-D Support Payment Distributive Fund; created; use.

The Title IV-D Support Payment Distributive Fund is created. The fund shall be used for the collection and disbursement of support payments as provided in sections 43-3341 to 43-3347.

Laws 1999, LB 637, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 31;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 6.